Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.150

Reports.

(1) A licensee shall file with the director within thirty days any material changes in information provided in a licensee's application as prescribed in rule by the director. If this information indicates that the licensee is no longer in compliance with this chapter, the director may take any action authorized under this chapter to ensure that the licensee operates in compliance with this chapter.

(2) A licensee shall report all licensee branch locations and all authorized delegates to the nationwide licensing system within thirty days of the contractual agreement with the licensee to provide money services in Washington. Accurate records must be maintained within the licensing system as prescribed in rule.

(3) A licensee shall file a report with the director within one business day after the licensee has reason to know of the occurrence of any of the following events:

(a) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee, or any authorized delegate of the licensee, under the United States Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. Sec. 101-110) for bankruptcy or reorganization;

(b) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee, or any authorized delegate of the licensee, for receivership, the commencement of any other judicial or administrative proceeding for its dissolution or reorganization, or the making of a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors;

(c) The commencement of a proceeding to revoke, suspend, restrict, or condition its license, or otherwise discipline or sanction the licensee, in a state or country in which the licensee engages in business or is licensed;

(d) The cancellation or other impairment of the licensee's bond;

(e) A charge or conviction of the licensee or of an executive officer, responsible individual, board director of the licensee, or person in control of the licensee, for a felony; or

(f) A charge or conviction of an authorized delegate for a felony.

[ 2017 c 30 s 12; 2013 c 106 s 6; 2003 c 287 s 17.]